Ohio, session 136, HB530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) The legislative Long-term Care Workforce 3
Study Commission is established. The Commission shall do all of 4
the following: 5
(1) Study the direct care and long-term care workforce in 6
this state and make policy recommendations in each of the 7
following areas: 8
(a) Measuring current demand for direct care workers and 9
projecting future needs of that workforce; 10
(b) Developing a campaign and statewide recruitment 11
strategies to encourage people to join the facility-based and 12
home and community-based long-term care workforce; 13
(c) Supporting career ladders throughout various long-term 14
care settings; 15
(d) Identifying educational needs and methods to fill 16

H. B. No. 530 Page 2
As Introduced
those needs for direct care workers, including establishing a 17
program to provide contributions to the postsecondary education 18
of long-term care direct care workers in related fields; 19
(e) Identifying barriers to hiring direct care workers and 20
methods to overcome those barriers; 21
(f) Developing strategies to improve the quality of long- 22
term care jobs; 23
(g) Increasing opportunities for shared staffing among 24
long-term care providers; 25
(h) Recommendations on funding mechanisms, and 26
establishing pilot programs regarding the direct care workforce, 27
such as to pool hours worked by part-time home care workers with 28
the purpose of providing greater employment opportunity and 29
access to employee benefits, or to provide postsecondary 30
education in relevant fields for direct care workers. 31
(2) Not later than August 31, 2027, issue a report of its 32
findings and recommendations to the General Assembly in 33
accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. In producing 34
the report, the Commission shall hear testimony from interested 35
parties and shall provide a public comment period for the draft 36
report language. 37
(B)(1) The Commission shall consist of the following 38
members: 39
(a) Four members of the General Assembly, as follows: 40
(i) Two members of the Senate, one from the majority party 41
and one from the minority party, each appointed by the President 42
of the Senate; 43
(ii) Two members of the House of Representatives, one from 44

H. B. No. 530 Page 3
As Introduced
the majority party and one from the minority party, each 45
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 46
(b) The following members who possess expertise in the 47
subject matter of the Commission's study, as follows: 48
(i) A direct care worker, appointed by the President of 49
the Senate; 50
(ii) A provider of home-based long-term care who is a 51
member of a statewide association representing home-based long- 52
term care providers, appointed by the President of the Senate; 53
(iii) A representative of a statewide association 54
representing nonprofit housing and senior service programming, 55
appointed by the President of the Senate; 56
(iv) A representative of an organization providing 57
services to individuals with intellectual disabilities and 58
autism, including employment services and long-term home and 59
community-based services, appointed by the President of the 60
Senate; 61
(v) A family member of an individual with a developmental 62
disability, appointed by the President of the Senate; 63
(vi) A consumer participating in a home and community- 64
based services waiver administered by the Department of Aging, 65
appointed by the President of the Senate; 66
(vii) A provider of facility-based long-term care 67
providers, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 68
Representatives; 69
(viii) A representative of a service coordination agency 70
providing service coordination to individuals receiving home- 71
based and community-based long-term care, appointed by the 72

H. B. No. 530 Page 4
As Introduced
Speaker of the House of Representatives; 73
(ix) A representative of an institution of higher 74
education engaged in workforce development, appointed by the 75
Speaker of the House of Representatives; 76
(x) A representative of an organization promoting 77
independent living for individuals with disabilities, appointed 78
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 79
(xi) A consumer participating in a home and community- 80
based services waiver administered by the Department of 81
Medicaid, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 82
Representatives; 83
(xii) A consumer participating in a home and community- 84
based services waiver administered by the Department of 85
Medicaid, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 86
Representatives. 87
(2) The Commission may invite all of the following to 88
serve as nonvoting members of the Commission: 89
(a) The Director of Health, or the Director's designee; 90
(b) The Director of Aging, or the Director's designee; 91
(c) The Director of Job and Family Services, or the 92
Director's designee; 93
(d) The Medicaid Director, or the director's designee; 94
(e) The Director of the Governor's Office of Workforce 95
Transformation, or the Director's designee; 96
(f) Members of the Direct Care Workforce Expansion Working 97
Group conducted by the Department of Job and Family Services. 98
(C)(1) Members of the Commission shall be appointed not 99

H. B. No. 530 Page 5
As Introduced
later than December 31, 2025. Members of the Commission 100
appointed pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall 101
serve so long as they continue to be members of the General 102
Assembly. A vacancy in the membership of the Commission shall be 103
filled in the same manner as the original appointment. Members 104
shall serve without compensation and may be reappointed. 105
(2) The appointed majority party members of the Senate and 106
House of Representatives shall serve as co-chairpersons of the 107
Commission. The Commission shall meet at least quarterly at the 108
call of either co-chairperson. 109
(D)(1) The co-chairpersons of the Commission may establish 110
subcommittees to carry out the duties listed in division (A)(1) 111
of this section and to assist the Commission. The subcommittees 112
must be composed of members of the Commission and interested 113
persons who are not members of the Commission who volunteer to 114
serve on the subcommittee. 115
(2) In carrying out its duties listed under division (A) 116
(1) of this section, the Commission shall take into 117
consideration the findings of the Direct Care Workforce 118
Expansion Working Group. 119
(E) Staff of the General Assembly shall provide technical 120
and administrative support as needed by the Commission. 121
(F) When it submits its recommendations described in 122
division (A)(2) of this section, the Commission shall cease to 123
exist. 124